Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 16

Urban Type Public Facilities

5-16-101. Power granted to counties — Chapter definitions.

The various counties of this state are hereby authorized to establish, construct, install, acquire, operate and maintain urban type public facilities in any area or areas within their borders, and to charge fees, rates and charges for such facilities.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Other governing body” means only that body having the taxing authority; and

“Urban type public facilities” means and includes sanitary and storm sewer lines and facilities, plants for the collection, treatment and disposal of sewage and waste matter, facilities and plants for the incineration or other disposal of garbage, trash, ashes and other waste matter, or water supply and distribution lines, facilities and plants, chemical pipelines and docks, or all of these things, and fire protection and emergency medical services.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 1; 1965, ch. 326, §§ 1, 2; 1967, ch. 308, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1601; Acts 2007, ch. 107, § 1; 2008, ch. 1034, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. County-wide fire departments, title 5, ch. 17.

Garbage, rubbish collection, title 5, ch. 19.

Local government public works, similar services, title 7, chs. 51-65.

Sanitary landfills, title 68, ch. 213.

Solid waste disposal, title 68, ch. 211.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Eugene Puett), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1335 (1961).

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of Tenn. Const., Art. II, § 29, OAG 90-39, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (3/19/90).

5-16-102. Resolution of authorization.

For the exercise of the powers conferred by this chapter, a county shall authorize same by resolution adopted by a majority of the county legislative body or other governing body. Such resolution shall provide for the exercise of such powers by either:

Some agency of the county already in existence;

A public works department to be created; or

A board established as provided in § 5-16-103.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1602.

5-16-103. Board of public utilities.
[For contingent amendment, see the Compiler’s Notes.]

In the event the resolution provides for the exercise of the powers provided for in this chapter by a board, upon the approval of the resolution, the county mayor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body, three (3), five (5) or seven (7) persons to comprise what shall be known as “the county board of public utilities.”

The county mayor shall have the option of appointing a seven-person board only in any county having a population of not less than sixty-seven thousand three hundred (67,300) nor more than sixty-seven thousand four hundred (67,400), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

In the event the board has three (3) members, the initial appointees shall serve for one (1), two (2) and three (3) years respectively, from July 1 next succeeding the date of appointment.

In the event five (5) members are desired as provided in subsection (a), the county mayor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body, such additional members to initial terms of two (2) and three (3) years respectively from July 1 next succeeding the date of appointment.

The terms of no more than two (2) members of the county board of public utilities shall expire at the same time.

In the event seven (7) members are desired as provided in subsection (a), the county mayor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body, the necessary additional members to initial terms of not more than three (3) years, beginning July 1 next succeeding the date of appointment.

The initial terms of the additional members shall be staggered in such a manner that the terms of no more than three (3) members of the county board of public utilities shall expire at the same time.

Successors to such appointees shall each be appointed for a term of three (3) years by the county mayor, subject to confirmation as provided in subsections (a) and (b).

The county mayor shall in like manner fill any vacancies that may occur for the unexpired terms of the vacancies.

Each member shall give such bond as may be required by resolution of the county legislative body.

Except as provided in this subsection (f), such members shall serve without compensation except for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

In any county having a population of not less than sixty-seven thousand three hundred (67,300) nor more than sixty-seven thousand four hundred (67,400), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in any county having a population of not less than one hundred forty thousand (140,000) nor more than one hundred forty-five thousand (145,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county legislative body may provide for compensation of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for a monthly meeting for such members upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body to which this subdivision (f)(2) may apply. The approval or nonapproval of this subdivision (f)(2) shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of such county legislative body and certified by such presiding officer to the secretary of state. If the county legislative body provides compensation for such members, the members shall also adopt a resolution that ratifies the compensation before any such compensation may be paid.

In counties having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand five hundred (24,500) nor more than twenty-four thousand five hundred sixty (24,560), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county legislative body may provide for compensation of such members upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body to which this subdivision (f)(3) may apply.

The approval or nonapproval of this subdivision (f)(3) shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of such county legislative body and certified by such presiding officer to the secretary of state.

Each member of any board created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, compiled in title 12, chapter 9, for the purpose of providing service to two (2) or more counties is, due to the increased responsibilities and duties arising as a result of such multi-county service area, entitled to compensation in an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) per month, the exact amount of such compensation to be determined by resolution of such board.

In counties having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand one hundred (28,100) nor more than twenty-eight thousand four hundred (28,400), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county legislative body may provide for compensation of such members upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of any county to which this subdivision (f)(5) may apply.

The approval or nonapproval of this subdivision (f)(5) shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of such county legislative body and certified by the presiding officer to the secretary of state.

In counties having a population of not less than twenty-six thousand seven hundred (26,700) nor more than twenty-six thousand eight hundred (26,800), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county legislative body may provide for compensation of board members upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body to which this subdivision (f)(6)(A) may apply.

The approval or nonapproval of subdivision (f)(6)(A) shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of such county legislative body and certified by such presiding officer to the secretary of state.

[For contingent amendment, see the Compiler’s Notes.]

In counties having a population of not less than fifty-one thousand nine hundred (51,900) nor more than fifty-two thousand (52,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county legislative body may provide for compensation of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per month for the board members; provided, that attendance at board meetings shall be required in order to receive the compensation, upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body to which this subdivision (f)(7)(A) may apply.

The approval or nonapproval of subdivision (f)(7)(A) shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the county legislative body and certified by the presiding officer to the secretary of state.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum.

The board shall elect its own chair, and shall be authorized to employ such clerical help as may be necessary.

The board shall hold public meetings at least once each month at such regular time and place as the board may determine, and special meetings upon the call of the chair.

The board shall establish its own rules of procedure.

Any member of the board may be removed from office for cause upon a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the county legislative body, but only after preferment of formal charges by a resolution of a majority of the county legislative body following a public hearing before it.

Before the board shall adopt any proposed budget or salary plan for its employees, it shall submit same to the county legislative body for approval or rejection.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in any county having a population of not less than sixty-seven thousand three hundred (67,300) nor more than sixty-seven thousand four hundred (67,400), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county mayor may appoint members of the county legislative body to serve upon the board. Such members shall be subject to confirmation as provided in subsections (a) and (b).

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(d), a county having a population greater than nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that creates a county board of public utilities on or after April 18, 2018 may call, in the resolution creating the board, for the election of the members of the board at the regular August election. The resolution shall:

Specify the number of members of the board of public utilities;

Specify the length of the terms of the members;

Provide for the staggering of terms;

Provide for the removal of members;

Provide for the filling of vacancies on the board; and

Specify the compensation for the members, if any.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 3; 1979, ch. 17, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1603; Acts 1988, ch. 916, § 1; 1989, ch. 396, §§ 1-4; 1990, ch. 879, § 1; 1991, ch. 35, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 134, § 1; 1994, ch. 583, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2006, ch. 515, § 1; Private Acts 2007, ch. 51, § 1; 2018, ch. 738, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1990, ch. 879, § 2 provided that, for any of the counties authorized by (f)(3), any compensation that had been provided for board members under the law as it existed before May 29, 1989, was thereby validated and affirmed.

Acts 1991, ch. 35, § 3 authorized, validated and affirmed any compensation, not exceeding the maximum amount authorized by (f)(4), received prior to March 19, 1991, by any member of a board specified in (f)(4).

Acts 1994, ch. 583, § 2, provided that for any of the counties authorized by subdivision (f)(5), any compensation that has been provided for board members under the law as it existed before March 4, 1994, is hereby validated and affirmed.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Private acts 2007, ch. 51, § 2 provided that the act, which added (f)(7) to this section, shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds vote of the legislative body of Roane County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (n).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 738, § 3. April 18, 2018.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Respective powers of county and board of public utilities as to operation of facilities, OAG 95-091, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (8/29/95).

County election commissioner serving on county board of public utilities. OAG 13-77, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (10/17/13).

5-16-104. Superintendent — Appointment — Compensation — Powers exercised on behalf of county.

The general supervision and control of the acquisition, improvement, operation and maintenance of the urban type public facilities as provided in this chapter shall be in charge of the board or other agency as provided in this chapter.

If the powers of this chapter are exercised by an agency other than the board as provided in this chapter, such agency shall have at its head a person to be known as a superintendent, to be appointed by the county mayor, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body or other governing body, and if such powers are exercised by a board, such board shall appoint a superintendent.

The superintendent in any case shall be a person who shall be qualified by training and experience for supervision over the maintenance and operation of the facilities as provided in this chapter.

Such person need not be a resident of the county or of the state at the time of such person's selection.

In the event that the powers as provided in this chapter are exercised by an agency other than the board as provided in this chapter, the salary of the superintendent shall be fixed by the county legislative body or other governing body.

If such powers are exercised by the board as provided in this chapter, the salary shall be fixed by the board, subject to approval of the county legislative body or other governing body.

In either case, the superintendent shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority and shall be subject to removal by that authority at any time.

Within the limits of the funds available therefor, all powers to acquire, improve, operate and maintain the facilities as provided in this chapter, and all powers necessary or convenient thereto, conferred by this chapter shall be exercised on behalf of the county by the board, or other agency, and the superintendent respectively.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1604; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-16-105. Superintendent — Powers and duties.

The superintendent shall have charge of all actual construction, the immediate management and operation of all the facilities as provided in this chapter and the enforcement of all rules, regulations, programs, plans and decisions of the governing authority, which shall be either the county legislative body or other governing body, or the board as provided in this chapter.

The superintendent shall hire all employees and fix their duties, excepting that the appointment of all technical consultants, advisers and legal assistants shall be subject to the approval of the governing authority.

The superintendent, with the approval of the governing authority, may fix compensation of all employees.

The superintendent may, with the approval of the governing authority, acquire and dispose of all property, real and personal, necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Title to such property shall in all cases be taken in the name of the county.

The superintendent, subject to the approval of the governing authority, shall let all contracts.

The superintendent may, however, make purchases of personalty up to a cost of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) without the approval of the governing authority, but subject to such regulations as the governing authority may prescribe.

Any contract for construction exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be advertised by the superintendent for bids.

If the powers conferred by this chapter are exercised by an agency other than the board as provided in this chapter, such bids shall be subject to the approval of the county mayor, and if they are exercised through the board, they shall be subject to approval of the board.

If the county has a central purchasing authority, purchases for the purposes herein contemplated must, at the discretion of the governing body of the county, be made through:

The central purchasing authority; or

The county board of public utilities, in accordance with purchasing policies approved by the governing body of the county.

The superintendent shall make and keep full and proper books and records, subject to the supervision and direction of the governing authority.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1605; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2011, ch. 193, § 1; 2018, ch. 556, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (d)(6), which read: “Where the county has a central purchasing authority, purchases made for the purpose herein contemplated shall be through such authority.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 556, § 2. March 14, 2018.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-16-106. Bonds.

The county legislative body is hereby authorized to issue bonds of the county for the purpose of financing the cost of establishment, construction, installation or acquisition of any urban type public facility.

Bonds so issued may be either general obligation bonds of the county secured by the full faith and credit and taxing power of the county, or revenue bonds secured by the revenues derived from the operation of the urban type public facility financed thereby, or by a combination of such revenues and the unpledged revenues derived by the county from any other urban type public facilities owned and operated by the county.

Any bonds issued by the county for the purpose of financing urban type public facilities shall be issued in the manner and form prescribed by the applicable provisions of title 9, chapter 21.

In the issuance of bonds, an urban type public facility so financed shall be deemed to be a “public works project,” as defined in title 9, chapter 21, and all power and authority conferred upon the county by the terms and provisions of title 9, chapter 21 with respect to the construction, operation, maintenance, financing and the fixing and collection of fees, rates, rents and other charges shall be available to and vested in the county with respect to the establishment, construction, installation, acquisition, operation, maintenance and financing of the urban type public facilities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1606; Acts 1988, ch. 750, §§ 4, 5.

5-16-107. Intergovernmental cooperation.

In connection with the operation of any urban type public facility as provided in this chapter, the board or other administrative agency, with the approval of the county legislative body or other governing body, is hereby authorized to enter into contracts with other governmental units or agencies, federal, state, or local, including municipalities, towns, utility districts and improvement districts within the county, for the furnishing of services and facilities within the purview of this chapter, and to enter into cooperative arrangements and agreements for providing such services and facilities, upon terms deemed advantageous by the board or other administrative agency.

With the approval of the county legislative body or other governing body, the board or other administrative agency is authorized to enter into contracts with any of such governmental units or entities to provide or share in the provision of any urban type facility and for the joint operation thereof, and to make or pay charges in connection therewith by written agreement with such unit or entity.

All governmental units subject to the jurisdiction of the state are hereby authorized to enter into contracts with the board or other administrative agency for providing any urban type public facility within the purview of this chapter, and to otherwise cooperate in furnishing such facilities, upon any terms deemed to be mutually advantageous.

In any cooperative undertaking by the board or other administrative agency with any other governmental unit or entity as described in this section for furnishing any of the facilities contemplated in this chapter, the county's share of the costs may be financed in the same manner as is provided for in § 5-16-106.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1607.

Cross-References. Interlocal cooperation with municipalities or contiguous counties, §§ 5-1-113, 5-1-114.

5-16-108. Sewerage facilities — Mandatory connection and use.

The board or other administrative agency is hereby authorized to require any person, firm or corporation owning or occupying property within an area of land in which sewerage facilities are maintained by the board or administrative agency, to connect with and use such facilities.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 8; T.C.A., § 5-1608.

5-16-109. Service charges — Rules and regulations.

The board or administrative agency shall determine and fix charges to be made for furnishing any and all of the facilities as provided in this chapter, upon a basis calculated to ensure the fiscal solvency of the operation at all times.

The board or administrative agency is further authorized and directed to make and publish reasonable rules and regulations covering the use by any individual, firm or corporation of any facility furnished to users.

A board or administrative agency that is increasing the charges for fire protection services by more than ten percent (10%) shall obtain approval for such increase from the county legislative body prior to the increase taking effect. This subsection (c) applies in any county having a population greater than nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 9; T.C.A., § 5-1609; Acts 2018, ch. 738, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 738, § 3. April 18, 2018.

5-16-110. Municipal annexation or incorporation — Effect on facilities.

Upon annexation by any municipality, or by including within the corporate territorial limits of any incorporating municipality, of an area including any of the facilities as herein authorized and provided, the municipality and the county legislative body or other governing body shall attempt to reach a written agreement for the allocation and conveyance to the municipality of any or all functions, rights, duties, property, assets or liabilities, in conjunction with such facilities, that justice and reason may require in the circumstances.

The annexing or incorporating municipality, for and to the extent that it may choose, shall have the exclusive right to provide such facilities within the annexed or incorporated area, and shall manifest such choice by proper resolution or ordinance at the first meeting of its governing body after the annexation or incorporation.

Subject to subdivision (a)(2), any such matters upon which the respective parties are not in written agreement within sixty (60) days after the operative date of such annexation shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the state laws of arbitration effective at the time of submission to the arbitrators, and § 29-5-101(2) shall not apply to any arbitration arising hereunder.

The award so rendered shall be transmitted to the chancery court, and thereupon shall be subject to review in accordance with §§ 29-5-113 — 29-5-115 and 29-5-118.

Subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) shall not apply to any city that is being incorporated if that city does not plan to furnish service that would compete with service the county is now furnishing.

If there are outstanding bonds or other obligations in conjunction with the public facilities as herein provided, the agreement or arbitration award shall also provide that the municipality will operate such facilities in the annexed or incorporated territory and account for the revenues therefrom in such manner as not to impair the obligations of contract with reference to such bonds or other obligations.

The rights vested in the holders of all such outstanding bonds or other obligations shall be fully preserved and in no wise impaired by any agreement or arbitration award.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1610; Acts 1980, ch. 489, §§ 1-3, 5.

5-16-111. Service near city or town — Restrictions.

A county may not extend any public facilities, as provided for in this chapter, within five (5) miles of any part of the boundary of an incorporated city or town unless such incorporated city or town has failed to take appropriate action to provide a specified public facility or facilities in a specified area or areas for a period of ninety (90) days after having been petitioned to do so by resolution of the county legislative body or other governing body. The resolution shall contain a plan of service, and shall be accompanied by a preliminary engineering report and a financial feasibility report, and shall set out the type, standard and schedule of installation of public facilities and the specified area or areas proposed to be served by the county. The resolution, plan of service and reports shall have been previously submitted to the local planning commission for review as provided for in § 5-16-112.

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1611.

5-16-112. Plan of services.

No county shall adopt the resolution provided for in § 5-16-102 until there is presented to the regional planning commission serving such county a plan of services for a specified area or areas, for study and a written report, to be rendered within ninety (90) days after such submission, unless by resolution of the county legislative body or other governing body a longer period is allowed.

Such plan of services shall set forth, at a minimum, the identification and proposed timing of the services to be rendered.

No county shall construct or acquire facilities under this chapter unless plans, including necessary engineering and financing plans, have been similarly presented to the planning commission for study and report.

In the event there is no such regional planning commission, then the referral shall be to the local planning commission of the largest municipality within the county having such a commission, and if no municipality within the county has such a planning commission, to the state planning office [abolished].

Acts 1961, ch. 166, § 12; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1612.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.